Massachusetts, session 194th, S1277.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 151C the following section:-
Section 151D. (a) For the purposes of this section:-
“Enforcing authority” shall include: any law enforcement officer, animal control officer
certified under section 151 of chapter 140, special state police officer duly appointed by the
colonel of the state police at the request of the Massachusetts Society for the Prevention of
Cruelty to Animals or the Animal Rescue League of Boston under section 57 of chapter 22C,
sheriff or deputy sheriff.
of 6

“Neglected” shall include, but not be limited to the following: (i) depriving the animal of
necessary sustenance; (ii) failing to provide the animal with proper food, drink, shelter, sanitary
environment, or protection from the weather; or (iii) allowing or permitting the animal to be
subjected to unnecessary suffering.
(b) To humanely protect any neglected animal, the enforcing authority may, upon
probable cause to be believe an animal has been neglected:
(1) Immediately remove an animal in an emergency situation from the animal’s present
location in order to take custody of the animal if the enforcing authority has an objectively
reasonable basis to believe that the animal is injured or in imminent danger of physical harm,
provided the enforcing authority’s conduct following entry for removal is reasonable under the
circumstances. A petition pursuant to this section shall be filed with the district court of the
county in which the animal is located within 10 calendar days of removal of the animal seeking
relief under this section;
(2) File a petition with the district court of the county in which the animal is located
seeking authority to order the owner or keeper of any animal found neglected to provide certain
care to such animal at the expense of the owner or keeper without removal of the animal from its
present location; or
(3) File a petition with the district court of the county in which the animal is located
seeking authority to seize the animal.
(c) Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to this section, wherein the enforcing authority
is seeking relief pursuant to this section, the clerk magistrate of the district court shall schedule
and commence a hearing on the petition before the justice of the district court within 10 calendar
of 6

days of the date the petition is filed to determine whether the animal is neglected and whether the
owner or keeper, if known, is able to humanely care for the animal. If there is any period of delay
beyond the initial 10 calendar days before a hearing can commence, and that delay is attributable
to the enforcing authority, the owner or keeper shall not be required to cover the cost of animal
care for such period of delay. After the hearing, the court order shall be entered within 10
calendar days. A fee may not be charged for filing of the petition. This subsection does not
require court action for stray or abandoned animals as lawfully performed by animal control
agents pursuant to section 151A of chapter 140 or any other individual authorized by law.
(d) If taking custody of an animal under this section, the enforcing authority shall serve
written notice upon the owner or keeper of the animal, in-hand, if such person is known, or leave
a copy of the written notice at the location where the animal was removed from, at least 3 days
before the hearing is scheduled under subsection (c).
(e) The enforcing authority taking custody of an animal under this section shall provide
care for the animal until either:
(1) The court determines the animal has been neglected and orders the forfeiture of the
animal to the enforcing authority, allowing the enforcing authority to permanently transfer the
animal;
(2) The court determines the animal has not been neglected and orders the enforcing
authority to return the animal to the animal’s owner or keeper, in which case the animal shall be
returned to the owner or keeper upon payment by the owner or keeper, for the care and provision
for the animal while in the custody of the enforcement authority; or
(3) The court determines humane euthanasia is in the best interest of the animal.
of 6

(f) If the evidence indicates the animal has been neglected, the burden is on the owner or
keeper to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that he or she is able to humanely care
for the animal.
(g) After a hearing, the court shall make a determination as to whether the animal has
been neglected.
(h) In determining whether the animal has been neglected, the court may consider, among
other matters:
(1) Testimony from the enforcing authority who removed or seized the animal and other
witnesses as to the condition of the animal when removed or seized and as to the conditions
under which the animal was kept;
(2) Testimony and evidence as to the veterinary care provided to the animal;
(3) Testimony and evidence as to the type and amount of care provided to the animal;
(4) Expert testimony as to the community standards for proper and reasonable care of the
same type of animal;
(5) Testimony from any witnesses as to prior treatment or condition of this or other
animals in the same custody;
(6) The owner or keeper’s past record of judgments pursuant to this chapter;
(7) Convictions or admissions to sufficient facts pursuant to applicable statutes
prohibiting cruelty to animals;
of 6

(8) Documentary or testimonial evidence of past investigations involving facts and
circumstances relating to the care and treatment of any animals; and
(9) Other evidence the court considers to be material or relevant.
(i) If after a hearing the court determines the animal has been neglected, the court may:
(1) Order that the owner or keeper have no further custody of the animal and the animal
forfeited to the custody of the enforcing authority or any agency or person the court deems
appropriate; or
(2) Order the animal be humanely euthanized, if in the best interest of the animal.
(j) If after a hearing the court determines the animal has not been neglected or subjected
to cruel conditions and orders the enforcing authority to return the animal to the animal’s owner
or keeper, the order shall provide that the animal in the possession of the enforcement authority
be claimed and removed by the owner or keeper within 7 days after the date of the order. If the
animal is not removed within 7 days, the animal shall be deemed abandoned by the owner or
keeper.
(k) The court’s judgment shall be final and neither party shall have the right to an appeal
of the judgment unless there exists a change in circumstance or newly discovered evidence
within 10 business days of the final judgment by the court. The appeal shall be in the form of a
motion to reconsider to the same justice who presided over the original hearing.
(l) The court may order that other animal(s) that are in the custody of the owner or
keeper, not removed or seized by the enforcing authority, be forfeited to the enforcing authority
if the court determines that the owner or keeper is unable to humanely care for any such
of 6

additional animal(s). The court may prohibit such owner or keeper from harboring, owning,
possessing, exercising control over, residing with, adopting, or fostering any additional
animal(s).
(m) The court, upon proof of costs incurred by the enforcing authority, may require that
the owner or keeper pay for the care of the animal while in the custody of the enforcing
authority. A separate hearing may be held.
(n) Nothing in this section precludes an enforcing authority from applying for a search
100 warrant to seize the animal pursuant to sections 1 through 7 of chapter 276 and section 83 of
101 chapter 272 and from pursuing criminal charges relating to the animal pursuant to the applicable
102 statutes prohibiting cruelty to animals.
of 6